District of Columbia statutes.
32-604

Findings and recommendations of consultant.

(a)

In order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the Department of Administrative Services shall provide, by contract with the consultant selected under § 32-603, for the conduct of a study and the preparation of a report by the consultant:

(1)

Containing the findings of the consultant pursuant to a study that explores whether there are discriminatory wage-setting practices and discriminatory wage differentials within any of the District’s position classification systems and includes a list of any positions determined as being subject to discriminatory wage-setting practices and the extent to which any discriminatory wage differentials are attributable to the practices;

(2)

Identifying, where applicable, alternative measures for eliminating those discriminatory practices and differentials set forth in the consultant’s findings made pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, other than any measure that would result in a reduction in the rate of pay, or a cap on the rate of pay for any position, including proposals relating to the development and use of equitable job-evaluation techniques and training programs for individuals who would be responsible for implementing those measures;

(3)

Specifying any measures identified under paragraph (2) of this subsection that are authorized under current law and making recommendations for any legislative, Mayoral, or other action, other than any action that would result in a reduction in the rate of pay for any existing positions, which may be necessary in order to carry out the other measures identified under paragraph (2) of this subsection; and

(4)

Setting forth a list showing by bargaining unit, where appropriate, and by pay plan for those employees not covered by collective bargaining agreements, gender and race-dominated classes in the District Career, Educational, Executive, and Excepted Services for which there exists a discriminatory wage differential.

(b)

Under the contract, the consultant shall be required to:

(1)

Meet jointly with the Commission and the Committee on Government Operations on a regular basis in order to keep the District informed of the progress and other developments in the performance of the study and to obtain any views or recommendations from them; and

(2)

Submit a report of his or her findings to the Commission within 18 months after the effective date of the contract.

(c)

The information exchanged at the meetings held under subsection (b)(1) of this section shall be considered confidential until the final report is submitted pursuant to § 32-607.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-162, § 5, 33 DCR 6684

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-607.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1104.